Utah statutes.
53A-25b-305.   Collaboration with Department of Health.
The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall collaborate with the
Department of Health to provide services to children with disabilities who are
younger than three years of age in accordance with the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.
